Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SCR1032.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona:
Section 1. Title 15, chapter 9, article 1, Arizona
Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-917, to
read:
15-917. Operational spending; direct instructional
expenses; enforcement; waivers
A. EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT [IN THIS STATE] [THAT HAS A
STUDENT COUNT OF AT LEAST SEVEN THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED OR THAT
OPERATES A SCHOOL IN A COUNTY WITH A POPULATION OF AT LEAST
FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND PERSONS] SHALL SPEND AT LEAST SIXTY
PERCENT OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING [AS
DEFINED BY THE OFFICE OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL] ON [TEACHER PAY]
[DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES]. BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR
2027-2028, ANY SCHOOL DISTRICT THAT SPENDS LESS THAN SIXTY
PERCENT OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON
[TEACHER PAY] [DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES] SHALL INCREASE
THE PORTION OF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING THAT
IS SPENT ON [TEACHER PAY] [DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES] EACH
YEAR BY AT LEAST ONE-HALF OF ONE PERCENT PER YEAR UNTIL THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT IS IN COMPLIANCE, SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1032
1. IF A SCHOOL DISTRICT INCREASES THE PORTION OF THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON [TEACHER PAY]
[DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES] BY MORE THAN ONE-HALF OF ONE
PERCENT PER YEAR, THE SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY COUNT THE PORTION OF
THE INCREASE THAT EXCEEDS ONE-HALF OF ONE PERCENT TOWARD ANY
INCREASE THAT IS REQUIRED IN A SUBSEQUENT YEAR.
2. IF A SCHOOL DISTRICT REDUCES THE PORTION OF THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT'S OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON [TEACHER PAY]
[DIRECT INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES], BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY:
(a) THE AUDITOR GENERAL MAY NOT CONSIDER THE REDUCTION
WHEN CALCULATING THE AMOUNT OF THE ANNUAL INCREASE THAT IS
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.
(b) THE SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY COUNT ONLY THE PORTION OF
AN INCREASE IN OPERATIONAL SPENDING ON [TEACHER PAY] [DIRECT
INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES] FOR A SUBSEQUENT YEAR THAT RESULTS IN
AN INCREASE ABOVE THE PORTION OF OPERATIONAL SPENDING BEFORE
THE REDUCTION.
B. IF THE AUDITOR GENERAL DETERMINES THAT A SCHOOL
DISTRICT [IS] [DID] NOT [COMPLYING] [COMPLY] WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED BY SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION [IN
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR] AND IF THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT RECEIVES MONIES FROM THE CLASSROOM SITE FUND
ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 15-977[:
1. ANY UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONIES DISTRIBUTED
TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT FROM THE CLASSROOM SITE FUND REVERT TO
THE CLASSROOM SITE FUND.
2.][, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REDUCE] THE SCHOOL [DISTRICT
IS INELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE MONIES FROM THE CLASSROOM SITE FUND
UNTIL THE OFFICE OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL DETERMINES THAT THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT IS IN COMPLIANCE] [DISTRICT'S ALLOCATION
PURSUANT TO SECTION 15-977, SUBSECTION G FOR THE BUDGET YEAR
BY THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS:
1. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DID NOT COMPLY FOR ONE YEAR,
AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT
THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE ALLOCATED TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.
2. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DID NOT COMPLY FOR TWO YEARS,
AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO FIFTY PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT THAT
WOULD OTHERWISE BE ALLOCATED TO THE SCHOOL DISTRICT.
-2-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1032
3. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DID NOT COMPLY FOR THREE
YEARS, AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE
AMOUNT THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE ALLOCATED TO THE DISTRICT.
4. IF THE SCHOOL DISTRICT DID NOT COMPLY FOR AT LEAST
FOUR YEARS, AN AMOUNT THAT IS EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT THAT WOULD
OTHERWISE BE ALLOCATED TO THE DISTRICT].
[3.] [C.] THE STAFF OF THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE BUDGET
COMMITTEE SHALL INCLUDE MONIES THAT [REVERT PURSUANT TO] [ARE
NOT DISTRIBUTED BECAUSE OF REDUCTIONS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION B
OF] THIS [SUBSECTION] [SECTION] IN THE CARRYFORWARD [AND
ADJUST THE PER PUPIL CALCULATIONS PURSUANT TO] [FOR THE
PURPOSES OF] SECTION 15-977, SUBSECTION G, PARAGRAPH 1 [TO
EXCLUDE THE WEIGHTED STUDENT COUNT FOR ANY SCHOOL DISTRICT
THAT IS INELIGIBLE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION].
[C.] [D.] THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION MAY
WAIVE THE REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED BY SUBSECTION B OF THIS
SECTION FOR A SCHOOL DISTRICT SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING:
1. THE DURATION OF A WAIVER PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
MAY NOT EXCEED ONE YEAR.
2. THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION MAY NOT
ISSUE [A WAIVER] [MORE THAN TWO WAIVERS] FOR A SCHOOL DISTRICT
[FOR MORE THAN TWO CONSECUTIVE YEARS] [DURING ANY TEN-YEAR
PERIOD, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 3 OF THIS SUBSECTION.
3. IF THE SUPERINTENDENT ISSUES A SECOND WAIVER FOR A
SCHOOL DISTRICT MORE THAN FOUR YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH
THE SUPERINTENDENT ISSUES A FIRST WAIVER FOR THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT, THE SUPERINTENDENT MAY ISSUE ANOTHER WAIVER FOR THE
SCHOOL DISTRICT AT ANY TIME DURING THE TEN-YEAR PERIOD THAT
BEGINS ON THE DATE THAT THE SUPERINTENDENT ISSUES THE SECOND
WAIVER].
[D.] [E.] THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE THIS STATE OR
AN OFFICER OR AGENCY OF THIS STATE TO MAINTAIN THE CLASSROOM
SITE FUND ESTABLISHED BY SECTION 15-977 OR ALLOCATE MONIES FOR
A CLASSROOM SITE FUND EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY THE LAWS
OF THIS STATE.
[F. THE AUDITOR GENERAL SHALL DEFINE "DIRECT
INSTRUCTIONAL EXPENSES" AND "OPERATIONAL SPENDING" FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.]
[E. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION:
1. "TEACHER" MEANS ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO IS CLASSIFIED AS
A TEACHER IN THE UNIFORM SYSTEM OF FINANCIAL RECORDS.
2. "TEACHER PAY" INCLUDES THE BASE SALARY, PERFORMANCE
PAY, OTHER COMPENSATION AND ALL EMPLOYEE BENEFITS THAT A
TEACHER RECEIVES AND THAT ARE PAID FOR BY THE SCHOOL
DISTRICT.]
-3-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1032
2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the
voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1,
section 1, Constitution of Arizona."
Enroll and engross to conform
Amend title to conform
JAKE HOFFMAN
SCR1032FloorHOFFMAN.docx
03/17/2026
5:27 PM
C: VS
130QFFWUK
-4-